Oklahoma, session 2026, SB612.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 158 of Title 17, unless there is


created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


A. Any public utility, as defined pursuant to Section 151 of


Title 17 of the Oklahoma Statutes, shall maintain an energy security


plan to provide guidance and oversight to maintain a reliable and


resilient supply of energy. The plan shall:


1. Identify, assess, and develop preparations for responding to


and recovering from events that disrupt energy supply; and


2. Include measures to notify the public of potential energy


disruptions and methods the public may adopt to reduce the


likelihood of realized disruptions.



Req. No. 666 Page 1


B. Public utilities shall update the energy security plan at


least annually and shall publish the plan on a publicly available


website.


SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.




60-1-666 RD 1/19/2025 5:40:03 AM





































Req. No. 666 Page 2